Utah statutes.
23-14-1.   Division of Wildlife Resources -- Creation -- General powers and duties -- Limits on authority of political subdivisions.

(1) (a)  There is created the Division of Wildlife Resources within the Department of Natural Resources under the administration and general supervision of the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources.

(b)  The Division of Wildlife Resources is the wildlife authority for Utah and is vested with the functions, powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities provided in this title and other law.

(2) (a)  Subject to the broad policymaking authority of the Wildlife Board, the Division of Wildlife Resources shall protect, propagate, manage, conserve, and distribute protected wildlife throughout the state.

(b)  The Division of Wildlife Resources is appointed as the trustee and custodian of protected wildlife and may initiate civil proceedings, in addition to criminal proceedings provided for in this title, to:

(i)  recover damages;

(ii)  compel performance;

(iii)  compel substitution;

(iv)  restrain or enjoin;

(v)  initiate any other appropriate action; and

(vi)  seek any appropriate remedies in its capacity as trustee and custodian.

(3) (a)  If a political subdivision of the state adopts ordinances or regulations concerning hunting, fishing, or trapping that conflict with this title or rules promulgated pursuant to this title, state law shall prevail.

(b)  Communities may close areas to hunting for safety reasons after confirmation by the Wildlife Board.



Amended by Chapter 211, 1995 General Session

